Hawaii statutes.
§455-1.5 Exceptions; scope of
chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or
restrict:

(1) The practice of a profession by individuals who
are licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this State who are
performing services within their authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice of naturopathic medicine by an
individual employed by the government of the United States while the individual
is engaged in the performance of duties required of the individual by the laws
and regulations of the United States;

(3) The practice of naturopathic medicine by students
enrolled in a school that meets the requirements of section 455-3. The
performance of naturopathic medicine by students shall be pursuant to a course
of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the supervision of
an instructor who is a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to this
chapter; and

(4) The practice by a doctor of naturopathic medicine
duly registered or licensed in another state, territory, or the District of Columbia
who is called into this State for consultation with a licensed naturopathic
physician, including in-person, mail, electronic, telephonic, fiber-optic, or
other telehealth consultation; provided that:

(A) The naturopathic physician from another
state shall not open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, or receive
calls within this State for the provision of care for a patient who is located
in this State; and

(B) The licensed naturopathic physician of
this State retains control and remains responsible for the provision of care
for the patient who is located in this State. [L Sp 2009, c 22, pt of §1; am L
2014, c 159, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next